North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-04 Motor Vehicle Registration
39-04-10.16.
Special vehicle license plates for volunteer emergency responders and volunteer firefighters. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this section:

“Fire department” means a certified city fire department, certified rural fire department, or certified fire protection district that has filed a certificate of existence under section 18-04-02.

“Volunteer emergency responder” means an emergency medical services provider certified by the department of health and human services and the individual’s squad leader for a continuous period exceeding two years and who receives an annual compensation of less than ten thousand dollars.

“Volunteer firefighter” means an active member in good standing with a North Dakota fire department who has had a continuous membership for a period exceeding two years and receives an annual compensation of less than ten thousand dollars from the fire department.

Upon application, the director shall issue red personalized plates to volunteer emergency responders and volunteer firefighters at no initial or annual cost to the volunteers. Qualified applicants are eligible to receive one set of plates. Plates may not be displayed on a vehicle with a registered gross weight exceeding twenty thousand pounds [9071.85 kilograms]. The first three digits of the plate are the last three digits of the zip code where the volunteer’s department is located. The remaining space may contain up to three characters of the volunteer’s choosing. This plate serves as an entrance pass to all North Dakota state parks. In cooperation with the volunteer organizations, the director shall designate qualifications and verification procedures for the plates issued under this section.

On termination of the registrant’s eligibility, the registrant shall return the plates to the director, who shall reissue for a fee of not more than five dollars, and upon payment of applicable registration fees, another number plate to which that registrant is entitled under this chapter.

If a registrant fails to return the plates to the director, the director, upon notification of the registrant’s ineligibility, may revoke the plates and reissue for a fee of not more than five dollars, and upon payment of applicable registration fees, another number plate for which the registrant is entitled under this chapter.

Source:

Adopted by initiated measure #4 on general election ballot approved November 6, 2018, effective December 6, 2018.; 2019, ch. 308, § 1, effective April 26, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 354, effective September 1, 2022.

39-04-11.
Display of number plates and tabs.

Unless otherwise provided by law, an individual may not operate a vehicle on a public highway of this state unless the vehicle has a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle by the department, and two number plates, bearing the distinctive number conspicuously displayed, horizontally and in an upright position, one on the front and one on the rear of the vehicle, each securely fastened, except number plates assigned to a house trailer must be attached to the rear of the house trailer. Number plates assigned to a motorcycle or trailer must be attached to the rear of the motorcycle or trailer and may be displayed vertically. When only one number plate is furnished for an apportioned vehicle registered under the international registration plan as authorized in section 39-19-04, truck tractor, or semitrailer, the plate must be attached to the front of the apportioned vehicle or truck tractor and the rear of the semitrailer. The bottom of each number plate must be at a height of not less than twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. Each plate must be mounted in a visible manner that clearly displays the distinctive number assigned to the vehicle and the name of the state on the plate. As far as is reasonably possible, the plates must at all times be kept free and clear of mud, ice, or snow so as to be clearly visible and all number plates, markers, or evidence of registration or licensing except for the current year must be removed from the vehicle. All vehicle license plates issued by the department are the property of the department for the period for which the plates are valid. An annual registration tab or sticker for the current registration year must be displayed on each number plate, in the area designated by the department for the tab or sticker, in those years for which tabs or stickers are issued in lieu of number plates.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 14, subss. a, c; R.C. 1943, § 39-0413; S.L. 1957, ch. 251, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 39-0413; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1965, ch. 270, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 13; 1981, ch. 381, § 2; 1985, ch. 418, § 2; 1999, ch. 12, § 8; 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

39-04-12.
Contents of number plates — Size of letters and numerals on plates — Reflectorized — Tabs or stickers.

Number plates must be of metal or other suitable material bearing the name of the state, either in full or by abbreviation, the number of the year, the slogan “Peace Garden State” and a distinctive number for assignment to each vehicle. The distinctive number may be in figures or a combination of figures and letters and must be of a size clearly distinguishable by law enforcement officers and individuals generally. To reduce highway accidents at night all number plates must be legible for a minimum distance of one hundred feet [30.48 meters] to an approaching motorist by day or night with lawful headlight beams and without other illumination. Each plate must be treated with a reflectorized material according to the specifications prescribed by the department. The department shall furnish for each annual registration a year plate, tab, or sticker to designate the year registration. The plate, tab, or sticker must show the registration year for which issued, and is valid only for that year.

The department may provide to an owner of a fleet of one hundred or more vehicles number plates that are valid for as many as six consecutive years and that are exempt from the requirements of evidence of annual validation. The registrant shall file with the department a corporate surety bond in an amount the department determines to be reasonable and adequate, and conditioned that the owner will pay the annual fee at the beginning of each annual registration period for which the number plates are valid.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 14, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 39-0414; S.L. 1957, ch. 251, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 39-0414; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 269, § 1; 1965, ch. 271, § 1; 1971, ch. 357, § 1; 1973, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 327, § 2; 1977, ch. 334, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, § 14; 1985, ch. 422, § 1; 1985, ch. 423, § 1; 1995, ch. 368, § 1; 2019, ch. 309, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-04-13.
Duplicates to be obtained of number plate, tab, sticker, or registration card if lost, mutilated, or illegible — Fee.

If any number plate, tab, sticker, or registration card issued under the provisions of this chapter is lost, mutilated, or becomes illegible, the person who is entitled thereto shall make immediate application for and obtain a duplicate or substitute upon furnishing information of such fact satisfactory to the department and upon payment of the cost of issuing the duplicate item, not to exceed the sum of five dollars for each duplicate number plate, tab, sticker, or registration card issued. The department may issue a duplicate number plate, tab, sticker, or registration card at no cost to the owner when satisfied the vehicle owner did not receive the original number plate, tab, sticker, or registration card which was issued.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 20; 1933, ch. 160, § 4, subs. c; 1935, ch. 176, § 1, subs. c1; R.C. 1943, § 39-0415; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 265, § 2; 1971, ch. 358, § 1; 1983, ch. 421, § 1; 1989, ch. 453, § 1.

39-04-14.
Renewal of registration.

Every vehicle registration, except those described in sections 39-04-14.1 and 39-04-14.4, under this chapter expires on December thirty-first each year and must be renewed annually upon application by the owner and by payment of the fees required by law, such renewal to take effect on the first day of January each year. An owner who has made proper application for renewal of registration of a vehicle previous to January first but who has not received the number plates, plate, or registration card for the ensuing year is entitled to operate or permit the operation of such vehicle upon the highways upon displaying thereon the number plates or plate issued for the preceding year for such time, to be prescribed by the department, as may be required for the issuance of the new plates. If a previously registered motor vehicle whose registered gross weight exceeds twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms] is purchased during the period the vehicle’s registration in this state is expired, the registration fee must be prorated on a monthly basis from the date of purchase to January first.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 39-0416; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 270, § 1; 1969, ch. 336, § 2; 1983, ch. 423, § 1; 1993, ch. 379, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 5; 2019, ch. 310, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

39-04-14.1.
Renewal of registration of motor vehicles under certain weight.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the registration of a motor vehicle whose registered gross weight does not exceed twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms] expires on the last day of the month which is the anniversary of the month it was originally registered. The registration may be renewed annually on application by the owner and payment of fees required by law. The renewal takes effect on the first day of the first month of the registration period. An owner of more than one vehicle qualifying for staggered registration under this section may renew all of the owner’s vehicles in the same month. The director shall prorate the registration fees accordingly. If a previously registered motor vehicle whose registered gross weight does not exceed twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms] is purchased during the period the vehicle’s registration in this state is expired, the department shall collect the annual registration fee under section 39-04-19 and shall issue registration that expires on the last day of the month that is the anniversary of the month the vehicle was purchased.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 336, § 3; 1983, ch. 422, § 1; 1993, ch. 379, § 2; 2009, ch. 322, § 6.

39-04-14.2.
Staggered registration for apportioned vehicles.

The director may establish a procedure for the implementation of a staggered registration system for vehicles registered pursuant to the international registration plan. Procedures established under this section may provide for a one-time collection of up to eighteen months of registration fees.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 366, § 2.

39-04-14.3.
Online registration renewal receipt showing compliance with registration is prima facie evidence.

The possession of a receipt, via the department’s online registration renewal service, is prima facie evidence of compliance with motor vehicle registration laws, with reference to the vehicle therein described, for a period of fifteen days from the date of the printed receipt.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 324, § 1.

39-04-14.4.
Renewal of motorcycle registration.

Every motorcycle registration under this chapter expires on March thirty-first and must be renewed every year upon application by the owner and by payment of the fees required by law. The renewal takes effect on the first day of April. The department may prorate the initial registration fee.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 310, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

39-04-15.
When registration fees become due and delinquent.

The registration fee for a vehicle becomes due as soon as the vehicle is used upon the highways of this state. The registration for a vehicle becomes delinquent immediately upon expiration of the prior registration.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 29; 1929, ch. 165, § 1; 1931, ch. 186, § 6; 1933, ch. 160, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 39-0417; S.L. 1951, ch. 241, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 39-0417; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 270, § 2; 1967, ch. 298, § 1; 1969, ch. 336, § 4; 1987, ch. 451, § 1.

Cross-References.

Refunds of registration fees, see § 39-04-39.2.

39-04-15.1.
Installment registration of vehicles licensed for a gross weight in excess of thirty-six thousand pounds [16329.33 kilograms] — Delinquencies — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 423, § 2.

39-04-16.
Penalty for delinquent registration fees — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 328, § 1.

39-04-17.
Certificate of notary showing compliance with registration is prima facie evidence — Penalty.

The possession of a certificate made out by a notary public or an authorized agent of a licensed vehicle dealer who took the acknowledgment of the application when the vehicle was first registered or required to be registered under the laws of this state, if such certificate shows the date of application, the make, registered weight, and year model of the motor vehicle, the manufacturer’s number of the motor vehicle which such application describes, and further shows that such notary public, or authorized agent of a vehicle dealer, personally mailed the application with the remittance fee, is prima facie evidence of compliance with motor vehicle law with reference to the vehicle therein described, for a period of seventy-five days from the date of such application. Any violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, § 36; 1933, ch. 160, § 12; 1935, ch. 176, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 39-0419; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1967, ch. 299, § 1; 1971, ch. 360, § 1; 1983, ch. 424, § 1; 2009, ch. 325, § 1; 2013, ch. 285, § 1.

39-04-18.
Motor vehicles exempt from registration fees — Reciprocal use of state highways by foreign licensed motor vehicles.

Except as provided in this section, a motor vehicle as defined in section 39-01-01 or a trailer operated or intended to be operated upon a highway, road, or street in this state must be registered annually with the department.

A semitrailer or a farm trailer operated or intended to be operated upon a highway, road, or street in this state must be registered with the department either annually or permanently, at the discretion of the registrant.

A vehicle being operated on highways, roads, or streets of this state must display license plates as furnished by the department upon payment of the fees prescribed in this chapter.

Upon satisfactory proof to the department that a motor vehicle owned by a resident of this state was not used upon any of the highways of this state in any one or more years, the motor vehicle may be registered upon payment of the registration fee for the current year.

A resident of the state of North Dakota, serving in the armed forces of the United States for a period of time greater than one year, may relicense a motor vehicle owned by the veteran without paying a fee or penalty for the intervening years when the vehicle was not licensed, providing the veteran shows by suitable affidavit that the vehicle was not in use during a year in which it was not licensed. The vehicle must be licensed for the license fee applicable to the month of the year in which application for license is made.

The following motor vehicles may be operated upon the highways, roads, and streets of this state without being registered, under such limitations as are herein specified; provided, however, that whenever the department determines that it is to the best interest of the state of North Dakota and determines by reciprocal agreement or otherwise that as great or greater privileges are not granted North Dakota residents while traveling in other states or territories, the department may cancel or limit the application of any exception to residents or motor vehicles from such other state or territory:

Farm tractors as defined in section 39-01-01, special mobile equipment and road rollers and other road construction or maintenance machinery that cannot be operated on the highways and streets of this state in a normal operating manner.

Motor vehicles owned by or in possession of Indian mission schools, by this state or any of its agencies, departments, or political subdivisions, including school districts possessing a motor vehicle or vehicles used for driver education instruction, or by any entity located upon the international boundary line between the United States of America and Canada used and maintained as a memorial to commemorate the long-existing relationship of peace and good will between the people and the governments of the United States of America and Canada and to further international peace among the nations of the world; provided, however, that the vehicles must display license plates provided by the department at actual cost. Upon request, qualifying law enforcement motor vehicles must be issued a license plate under section 39-04-10.9.

Motor vehicles registered in any other state or territory when coming into this state a distance not exceeding twenty miles [32.19 kilometers]; provided, however, that such motor vehicles have displayed thereon the current license plates issued by the state or territory in which they are registered and provided further that the owners or operators thereof are not residents of this state. Nor may such vehicles be required to pay any other tax, and no registration fee or tax may be required when such vehicles do not leave the incorporated limits of any city while in the state of North Dakota within a zone circumscribed by a line running parallel to the corporate limits of any city or contiguous cities and twenty miles [32.19 kilometers] distant therefrom. This section does not prevent trucks from coming into the state such distance as shall be necessary to reach the nearest railway shipping station. For purposes of this subdivision, an individual is a resident of this state if the individual is gainfully employed or engages in any trade, profession, or occupation within this state and owns, leases, or rents a place of residence or otherwise lives within this state for the purposes of employment, or regardless of domicile or any other circumstance, remains in this state for a period of at least ninety consecutive days. For purposes of this subdivision, a resident does not include a student at a university, college, or technical school in this state or a daily commuter from another jurisdiction if that jurisdiction exempts the vehicle of a daily commuter from this state from registration in that jurisdiction under a reciprocity agreement.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States government, or any foreign government, or any of their agencies or departments; provided, however, that such motor vehicles must display identification plates.

Passenger motor vehicles registered in any other state or territory; provided, however, that such motor vehicles have displayed thereon the current license plates issued by the state or territory in which they are registered and provided further that the owners or operators thereof are not residents of this state. For purposes of this subdivision, an individual is a resident of this state if the individual is gainfully employed or engages in any trade, profession, or occupation within this state and owns, leases, or rents a place of residence or otherwise lives within this state for the purposes of employment, or regardless of domicile or any other circumstance, remains in this state for a period of at least ninety consecutive days. For purposes of this subdivision, a resident does not include a student at a university, college, or technical school in this state or a daily commuter from another jurisdiction if that jurisdiction exempts the vehicle of a daily commuter from this state from registration in that jurisdiction under a reciprocity agreement.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by a manufacturer of motor vehicles when such motor vehicles are operated or moved such distance as may be authorized by the director from the factory where manufactured or assembled, to a depot or place of shipment or other point of delivery; provided, however, that such vehicles have displayed in plain sight the name and address of the manufacturer and a written permit from local police authorities.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by a licensed North Dakota motor vehicle dealer from a railway depot, warehouse, salesroom, or place of shipment; provided, however, that such vehicles have displayed in plain sight the name and address of the dealer and a written permit from the local police authorities.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by nonresidents engaged in harvest of agricultural products from June first through December thirty-first of any one year; provided, however, that such motor vehicles have displayed thereon a decal or other means of identification issued by the director upon payment of a fee of fifty dollars.

Vehicles owned by nonresident military personnel stationed in this state and operated by such military personnel or their dependents, provided such vehicle is registered in the state or territory whereof such military person is a resident, and provided further that current license plates from such state or territory are displayed on such vehicle.

Motor vehicles not exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] registered gross weight owned and operated by a disabled veteran under the provisions of Public Law 79-663 [38 U.S.C. 3901], a disabled veteran who has a one hundred percent service-connected disability as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs, or a disabled veteran who has an extra-schedular rating to include individual unemployability that brings the veteran’s total disability rating to one hundred percent as determined by the department of veterans’ affairs is entitled to display either a distinctive license plate or a standard plate that does not identify the veteran as a veteran or disabled veteran which is issued by the department. This exemption applies to no more than two such motor vehicles owned by a disabled veteran at any one time. A surviving spouse of a disabled veteran who has not remarried and who is receiving department of veterans’ affairs dependency and indemnity compensation retains the exemption of the deceased veteran who qualified under this subdivision for one vehicle.

Motor vehicles having not over two axles and not being used in combination owned and operated by nonresidents and any motor vehicle or combination of three axles or more operated in this state pursuant to a proportional licensing or other agreement or arrangement with any jurisdiction having motor vehicle registration authority.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by a resident building mover or by a resident well driller; provided, however, that such vehicles are used only for moving buildings or building-moving equipment, or are used only for drilling water wells or moving water well-drilling equipment; provided, further, that such vehicles display a license plate issued by the director upon the payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars for two axle trucks, fifty dollars for tandem axle trucks and single axle truck-tractor units, and seventy-five dollars for each tandem axle truck-tractor unit.

Any trailer, semitrailer, or farm trailer when the gross weight, not including the weight of the towing vehicle, does not exceed one thousand five hundred pounds [680.39 kilograms] and it is not for hire or commercial use, or when used to transport recreational vehicles or boats and it is not for hire or commercial use.

Any vehicle which is driven or moved upon a highway only for the purpose of crossing the highway from one property to another. The crossing must be made at an angle of approximately ninety degrees to the direction of the highway.

Passenger motor vehicles, house cars, or pickup trucks not exceeding twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms] registered gross weight owned and operated by a resident who, while serving in the United States armed forces, was a prisoner of war and has received an honorable discharge from the United States armed forces is entitled to display a distinctive license plate issued by the department. This exemption also applies to any passenger motor vehicle, house car, or pickup truck not exceeding twenty thousand pounds [9071.84 kilograms] registered gross weight subsequently purchased or acquired by such a former prisoner of war. This exemption applies to no more than two motor vehicles owned by a former prisoner of war at any one time. A surviving spouse of a former prisoner of war who has not remarried retains the exemption of the deceased veteran who qualified under this subdivision for one vehicle.

Motor vehicles not exceeding twenty-six thousand pounds [11793.40 kilograms] registered gross weight owned and operated by a veteran who was awarded the purple heart is entitled to a distinctive license plate issued by the department. This exemption applies to one motor vehicle owned by a veteran who was awarded the purple heart.

Upon satisfactory proof to the department that a motor vehicle owned by a resident of this state was not used upon any of the highways of this state in any one or more years, the motor vehicle may be registered upon payment of the registration fee for the current year.

Any resident of the state of North Dakota, serving in the armed forces of the United States for a period of time greater than one year, may relicense any motor vehicle owned by the veteran without paying any fee or penalties for the intervening years when the vehicle was not licensed, providing the veteran shows by suitable affidavit that the vehicle was not in use during any year in which it was not licensed. The vehicle must be licensed for the license fee applicable to the month of the year in which application for license is made.

Each motor vehicle loaned or furnished by a licensed North Dakota motor vehicle dealer to a school district in North Dakota to be used exclusively for instructing pupils in the driver education and training program conducted by the school district will be assigned an official license plate. The license plates must be used only on the motor vehicles furnished by dealers and used in the driver education program, and for no other purpose except for garaging and safekeeping of the motor vehicle.

A person may not use a driver education motor vehicle bearing official license plates for any purpose other than driver education course instruction. A person is not in violation of this subdivision if the person is required by the dealer or a school administrator to house or otherwise protect the vehicle at the person’s home or other facility.

Any vehicle which has been issued this special motor vehicle license may be registered under the regular motor vehicle registration law, by payment of the difference between the amount paid for the special motor vehicle license and the regular registration fee for such vehicle.

Any vehicle which has been issued this special motor vehicle license and is found being operated upon the highways of this state without being equipped with special house-moving or well-drilling equipment shall forfeit the fee paid and, in addition, must be required to register under the regular motor vehicle registration law of this state. None of the above limitations may be construed as restricting the operation of the special licensed vehicle when such operation would not require a greater fee than that paid for this operation.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 179, §§ 7, 8, 17, 19, 28, 29; 1929, ch. 165, § 1; 1929, ch. 167, § 1; 1931, ch. 186, §§ 4, 6; 1933, ch. 160, §§ 6, 10; 1933, ch. 162, §§ 2, 4; 1935, ch. 186, § 1; 1935, ch. 187, § 1; 1939, ch. 168, § 1; 1941, ch. 192, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, §§ 39-0402 to 39-0404, 39-0421, 39-0425, 39-0432, 39-0441, 39-0446, 39-0449, 39-0457; S.L. 1947, ch. 263, § 1; 1947, ch. 271, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1947, ch. 272, § 1; 1947, ch. 276, § 1; 1949, ch. 242, §§ 1, 2; 1951, ch. 240, § 1; 1951, ch. 242, § 1; 1953, ch. 236, §§ 1 to 3; 1953, ch. 240, § 1; 1955, ch. 242, § 1; 1955, ch. 246, §§ 1 to 3; 1955, ch. 248, § 1; 1957, ch. 254, § 1; 1957, ch. 266, §§ 1 to 3; 1957 Supp., §§ 39-0401 to 39-0403, 39-0421, 39-0425, 39-0432, 39-0446, 39-0449, 39-0473 to 39-0475; S.L. 1959, ch. 289, § 15; 1963, ch. 405, § 3; 1967, ch. 300, § 1; 1967, ch. 305, §§ 1, 2; 1969, ch. 337, § 1; 1971, ch. 361, § 1; 1973, ch. 291, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 422; 1975, ch. 329, § 1; 1977, ch. 327, § 3; 1977, ch. 335, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 76; 1979, ch. 409, §§ 2, 3; 1979, ch. 410, § 1; 1981, ch. 378, §§ 16, 17; 1981, ch. 382, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 72; 1983, ch. 425, § 1; 1987, ch. 452, § 1; 1989, ch. 356, § 15; 1989, ch. 454, § 1; 1997, ch. 328, § 2; 2001, ch. 329, § 2; 2001, ch. 334, § 1; 2003, ch. 310, § 1; 2005, ch. 324, § 3; 2007, ch. 321, § 1; 2009, ch. 322, § 7; 2011, ch. 267, § 4; 2011, ch. 447, § 2; 2011, ch. 268, § 1; 2013, ch. 284, § 3; 2015, ch. 261, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 262, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 309, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 2 of chapter 261, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 2 of chapter 262, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 39–04–18 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1–02–09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 262 Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1360, and Section 2 of Chapter 261, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2142.

Cross-References.

Reciprocity agreements, see ch. 39-19.

39-04-18.1.
Failure to register upon gainful employment.

A person operating a motor vehicle in violation of subdivision c or e of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18 shall purchase an annual registration for that motor vehicle for a fee that is not discounted from the appropriate amount listed in a table in section 39-04-19. A law enforcement officer may issue a registration for that vehicle and shall remit the registration fee to the department of transportation. The department shall provide for evidence of registration to be issued by a law enforcement officer enforcing subdivision c or e of subsection 2 of section 39-04-18.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 335, § 1.

39-04-18.2.
Temporary motor vehicle registration — Fees.

Any owner, lessee, or operator of a motor vehicle who is employed in this state on a temporary or full-time basis may choose to purchase a temporary registration permit in lieu of registering the vehicle pursuant to section 39-04-18, if the vehicle displays a valid registration and license plate from another jurisdiction and is properly insured. Application for the temporary registration permit must be made in the manner and form prescribed by the department. The temporary registration permit must bear a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle and an expiration date. At all times the operator shall ensure that the temporary registration permit is displayed and clearly visible on the vehicle in a manner prescribed by the department. Motor vehicles temporarily registered under this section may be registered without a title transfer or imposition of motor vehicle excise tax. The operator shall keep evidence of registration from the other jurisdiction in the motor vehicle and provide evidence of registration to a law enforcement officer or the department, upon request.

Motor vehicles temporarily registered in this state must be furnished a permit as follows:

Passenger vehicles, pickups, vans, and trucks not exceeding twenty thousand registered gross weight pounds [9071.84 kilograms] temporarily registered in this state must be furnished a permit upon payment of sixty dollars for six months or one hundred twenty dollars for twelve months of required registration.

Trucks or combinations of trucks and trailers weighing more than twenty thousand registered gross weight pounds [9071.84 kilograms] temporarily registered in this state must be furnished a permit upon payment of the following fees:

Motorcycles temporarily registered in this state must be furnished a permit upon payment of thirty dollars for six months or sixty dollars for twelve months.

An additional fee of ten dollars applies to each temporary registration permit.

Weight Six-Month Fee Twelve-Month Fee 20,001 - 42,000 $220 $440 42,001 - 62,000 $380 $760 62,001 - 82,000 $530 $1,060 82,001 - 105,500 $900 $1,800

Click to view

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 268, § 2.